Utah statutes.
65A-12-2.   Reclamation Trust Fund -- Carey Act Expense Fund.
(1) (a)  All moneys received by the division from the sale of lands selected
under this chapter shall be deposited with the state treasurer.
(b)  Any sums necessary shall be available for the payment of the expenses of
the division in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
(2) (a)  Any balance remaining over and above the expenses necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a trust fund to be used
only for the reclamation of other arid lands.
(b) (i)  Until there is sufficient money in the Reclamation Trust Fund, the
expenses of the division in carrying out the provisions of this chapter may be
paid from a Carey Act Expense Fund to be appropriated by the Legislature.
(ii)  The Division of Finance shall register claims paid out of the expense
fund in the order of their presentation.
(c)  Whenever, except as provided in this chapter, money in the reclamation
trust fund equals a claim which has been paid out of the Carey Act Expense
Fund, the Division of Finance shall draw a warrant on the reclamation fund to
reimburse the state for sums that have been paid out of the Carey Act Expense
Fund.
(3) (a)  The division shall draw by requisition on the Division of Finance the
sums necessary to pay the United States in order to obtain patent to lands
accepted in this chapter.
(b)  The Division of Finance shall draw this warrant on the Reclamation Trust
Fund giving precedence to sums to be paid to the United States over warrants
to reimburse the state for expenses.
